Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5701
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5701 to 44-5708 shall be known and may be cited as the Producer-Controlled Property and Casualty Insurer Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 68.